Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3887
Reviewing compliance.

Compliance with the prudent investor rule is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time of a trustee's decision or action and not by hindsight.

Laws 1997, LB 54, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1997), § 8-2209;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 87.